Hawaii statutes.
§666-7 Jurisdiction; joinder. In any
action for summary possession begun under this chapter, the plaintiff may join
claims for rent, lodging, board, profits, damages, and waste, where these arise
out of and refer to the land or premises, irrespective of the amount claimed.

In any such action, whether the ground or cause
is nonpayment of rent or otherwise, the plaintiff may join in the action a
prayer for accrued rent due, if any, and also for rent, profits, and damages up
to the time of judgment, if such is rendered in the plaintiff's favor, without
prejudice to such action or ground for summary possession as may be set forth
in the complaint. [L 1915, c 171, §1; am L 1923, c 93, §1; RL 1925, §2780; RL
1935, §4015; RL 1945, §10406; am L 1945, c 216, §1; RL 1955, §240-7; HRS
§666-7; am L 1972, c 90, §8(d); gen ch 1985]

Rules of Court

See DCRCP rule 18.

Case Notes

Holding over after notice of change of rent. 30 H. 29
(1927).

Recoupment for damages by reason of illegal eviction. 30 H.
434 (1928).

Items of damage recoverable by lessor. 30 H. 853 (1929).

Jurisdiction of district court where defendant demanded trial
by jury, discussed. 70 H. 288, 769 P.2d 1091 (1989).

This chapter does not preclude a landlord from joining a
breach of contract action, seeking damages as measured by future rent, with a
summary possession action. 84 H. 75, 929 P.2d 88 (1996).

Cited: 27 H. 308, 322 (1923); 40 H. 236 (1953).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next